Vermont, session 2025-2026, H39.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 18 V.S.A. § 4256 is amended to read:
§ 4256. OVERDOSE PREVENTION CENTERS
(a) An overdose prevention center:
(1) provides a space, either at a fixed location or a mobile facility,
supervised by health care professionals or other trained staff where persons
who use drugs can consume preobtained drugs and medication for substance
use disorder;
(2) provides harm reduction supplies, including sterile injection
supplies; collects used hypodermic needles and syringes; and provides secure
hypodermic needle and syringe disposal services;
(3) provides drug-checking services;
(4) answers questions on safer consumption practices;
(5) administers first aid, if needed, and monitors and treats potential
overdoses;
(6) provides referrals to addiction treatment, medical services, and social
services;
(7) educates participants on the risks of contracting HIV and viral
hepatitis, wound care, and safe sex education;
(8) provides overdose prevention education and distributes overdose
reversal medications, including naloxone;
VT LEG #379120 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.39
2025 Page 3 of 6
(9) educates participants regarding proper disposal of hypodermic
needles and syringes;
(10) provides reasonable security of the program site;
(11) establishes operating procedures for the program as well as
eligibility criteria for program participants; and
(12) trains staff members to deliver services offered by the program.
(b) The Department of Health, in consultation with stakeholders and health
departments of other jurisdictions that have overdose prevention centers, shall
develop operating guidelines for overdose prevention centers not later than
September 15, 2024. The operating guidelines shall include the level of staff
qualifications required for medical safety and treatment and referral support
and require an overdose prevention center to staff trained professionals during
operating hours who, at a minimum, can provide basic medical care, such as
CPR, overdose interventions, first aid, and wound care, as well as have the
ability to perform medical assessments with program participants to determine
if there is a need for emergency medical service response. Overdose prevention
center staff may include peers, case managers, medical professionals, and
mental health counselors.
(c)(1) The following persons are entitled to the immunity protections set
forth in subdivision (2) of this subsection for participation in or with an
approved overdose prevention center that is acting in the good faith provision
VT LEG #379120 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.39
2025 Page 4 of 6
of overdose prevention services in accordance with the guidelines established
pursuant to this section:
(A) an individual using the services of an overdose prevention center;
(B) a staff member, operator, administrator, or director of an
overdose prevention center, including a health care professional, manager,
employee, or volunteer; or
(C) a property owner, lessor, or sublessor on the property at which an
overdose prevention center is located and operates;
(D) an entity operating the overdose prevention center; and
(E) a State or municipal employee acting within the course and scope
of the employee’s employment.
(2) Persons identified in subdivision (1) of this subsection shall not be:
(A) cited, arrested, charged, or prosecuted for unlawful possession of
a regulated drug in violation of this chapter or for attempting, aiding or
abetting, or conspiracy to commit a violation of any of provision of this
chapter;
(B) subject to property seizure or forfeiture for unlawful possession
of a regulated drug in violation of this chapter;
(C) subject to any civil liability or civil or administrative penalty,
including disciplinary action by a professional licensing board, credentialing
VT LEG #379120 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.39
2025 Page 5 of 6
restriction, contractual liability, or medical staff or other employment action;
or
(D) denied any right or privilege.
(3) The immunity provisions of subdivisions (2)(A) and (B) of this
subsection apply only to the use and derivative use of evidence gained as a
proximate result of participation in or with an overdose prevention center.
Entering, exiting, or utilizing the services of an overdose prevention center
shall not serve as the basis for, or a fact contributing to the existence of,
reasonable suspicion or probable cause to conduct a search or seizure.
(4) The immunity provisions in subdivision (2)(C) of this subsection
shall not apply to:
(A) an individual using the services of an overdose prevention center
if the basis for the civil claim is that the person operated a motor vehicle in
violation of 23 V.S.A. § 1201; or
(B) claims unrelated to the provision of overdose prevention services.
(d) An entity operating an overdose prevention center shall make publicly
available the following information annually on or before January 15:
(1) the number of program participants;
(2) deidentified demographic information of program participants;
(3) the number of overdoses and the number of overdoses reversed on-
site;
VT LEG #379120 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.39
2025 Page 6 of 6
(4) the number of times emergency medical services were contacted and
responded for assistance;
(5) the number of times law enforcement were contacted and responded
for assistance; and
(6) the number of participants directly and formally referred to other
services and the type of services.
(e) An overdose prevention center shall not be construed as a health care
facility for purposes of chapter 221, subchapter 5 of this title. [Repealed.]
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
VT LEG #379120 v.3